Utah statutes.
76-3-303.   Additional sanctions against corporation or association --
Advertising of conviction -- Disqualification of officer.
(1) When a corporation or association is convicted of an offense, the court
may, in addition to or in lieu of imposing other authorized sanctions, require
the corporation or association to give appropriate publicity of the conviction
by notice to the class or classes of persons or section of the public
interested in or affected by the conviction, by advertising in designated
areas, or by designated media or otherwise.
(2)  When an executive or high managerial officer of a corporation or
association is convicted of an offense committed in furtherance of the affairs
of the corporation or association, the court may include in the sentence an
order disqualifying him from exercising similar functions in the same or other
corporations or associations for a period of not exceeding five years if it
finds the scope or willfulness of his illegal actions make it dangerous or
inadvisable for such functions to be entrusted to him.
